New York, session 2025-2026, S8022.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any general, special or local law or code 2 to the contrary, the town board of the town of Dekalb in St. Lawrence 3 county, may by local law, ordinance, order, rule or regulation establish 4 maximum speed limits at not less than forty-five miles per hour along 5 United States route eleven, beginning one quarter mile north of the 6 United States route eleven and East Dekalb Road intersection and ending 7 one quarter mile south of the entrance to the Hermon-DeKalb Central 8 school athletic fields. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05556-01-5